

Mellon Capital Management Corporation: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 26, 2017 2:51 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Mellon Capital Management Corporation



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Mellon Capital Management Corporation is a privately owned investment manager. The firm primarily provides its services to pension and profit sharing plans. It also caters to individuals, investment companies, pooled investment vehicles, charitable organizations, corporations, state or municipal government entities, and insurance companies. The firm manages separate client-focused equity, fixed income, and balanced portfolios. It launches and manages equity, fixed income, multi-asset, and balanced mutual funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity, fixed income, currency, and alternative markets across the globe. It also makes its investments in index-based funds and hedge f...
Mellon Capital Management Corporation is a privately owned investment manager. The firm primarily provides its services to pension and profit sharing plans. It also caters to individuals, investment companies, pooled investment vehicles, charitable organizations, corporations, state or municipal government entities, and insurance companies. The firm manages separate client-focused equity, fixed income, and balanced portfolios. It launches and manages equity, fixed income, multi-asset, and balanced mutual funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity, fixed income, currency, and alternative markets across the globe. It also makes its investments in index-based funds and hedge funds. For the equity portion of its portfolio, the firm makes its investments in value and growth stocks of companies across all capitalizations. It also employ indexing strategies to make its investments. For the fixed income portion of its portfolio, the firm makes its investments in diversified portfolio of investments including U.S. convertible bonds, long duration corporate bonds, and government bonds with maturity of 20 years or less. It employs fundamental and quantitative analysis with top-down and bottom-up stock picking approach to create its portfolio. The firm also employs a long/short strategy to make its alternative investments. It benchmarks the performance of its equity and fixed income portfolios against various S&P Indices, MSCI Indices, Russell Indices, Dow Jones Indices, Barclays Indices, FTSE Indices, Wilshire Indices, J.P. Morgan World Government Bond Index ex-U.S. Index, U.S. Total Stock Market Index, NASDAQ-100 Index, Nikkei 225, Total Stock Market Index, and World Government Bond Index. The firm minimizes its investments in companies with high carbon emissions. It employs a combination of in-house and external research to make its investments. The firm was founded in 1983 and is based in San Francisco, California with additional offices in Boston, Massachusetts, Houston, Texas, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, Pune, India, and San Francisco, California. Mellon Capital Management Corporation operates as a subsidiary of MBC Investments Corporation.
Detailed Description


50 Fremont StreetSuite 3900San Francisco, CA 94105United StatesFounded in 1983



Phone: 415-546-6056

Fax: 415-777-5699

www.mcm.com







Key Executives for Mellon Capital Management Corporation




Ms. Gabriela Franco Parcella J.D.


      	Chief Executive Officer, President and Chairman
      








Mr. Thomas F. Loeb


      	Co-Founder, Director and Chairman Emeritus
      








Mr. William Lewis Fouse CFA


      	Co-Founder, Chairman Emeritus, and Director
      








Ms. Brenda J. Oakley


      	Co-founder, Executive Vice President and Chief Administrative Officer
      








Mr. David Manuel


      	Chief Financial Officer and Director
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Mellon Capital Management Corporation Key Developments

Mellon Capital Presents at BNY Mellon ETF Symposium, Oct-21-2015 01:00 PM
Oct 17 15
Mellon Capital Presents at BNY Mellon ETF Symposium, Oct-21-2015 01:00 PM. Venue: St. Regis Monarch Beach Resort, Dana Point, CA 92629, United States. Speakers: Luke O’Neill, Head of Product Development and Management.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Mellon Capital Management Corporation, please visit www.mcm.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





   Mellon Capital Management - Mellon Capital                                                    Client Login Contact Us           













   mcm                         Summer 2017 | Our Current OutlookOur latest perspectives on several key asset classes Read more      Will the G20 stand by the Paris Agreement?Mellon Capital and joins 390 investors to urge G20 to stand by Paris Agreement. Read more      ExxonMobil vote: Meaningful or symbolic?Resolution drew strong support from shareholders, including Mellon Capital. Read more      Fortune's 50 Most Powerful LatinasMellon Capital's CEO named third among corporate America's 50 most powerful Latinas. Read more      Set your sights on excess returnsDiscover Dynamic U.S. Equity Learn more                        Mellon Capital. Global. Insightful. Engaged. For over 30 years, Mellon Capital has been widely recognized as a pioneer in applying modern portfolio and capital market theory to the investment process. Our intellectual curiosity drives us. Your challenges compel us. Together we create solutions.  Read More    Please note that all investment strategies involve risk. PAST PERFORMANCE IS NOT NECESSARILY INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS.                  Mellon Capital's Legacy Built on a foundation of innovation   Dynamic U.S. Equity In search of excess returns in today's market                 Insight Put uncalled capital to work   Dynamic Total Return Constantly pursuing volatility-managed growth                      Contact Us  Headquarters 50 Fremont Street Suite 3900 San Francisco, CA 94105 415.546.6056      About Us    Our Management Team        Strategies    Active Equity     Alternatives     Asset Allocation     Fixed Income     Indexing     Responsible Investing          Insights     Press     Careers    Disclosures     Privacy Statement     Security Notice     Terms of Use     Customer Complaints                               Contact Us - Mellon Capital                                                 Client Login Contact Us           













   mcm            Back to Home            Contact Us     General Inquiries  Email    Global Distribution Richard Watson 617.722.6903  Email    International Investors and Clients Keiko Kai 415.975.3556  Email    Public Relations Laura Nemeth 415.267.1213  Email                        If you have questions about our products or services, would like general information about the company, or have comments about, or issues with Mellon Capital's website, enter your comments or questions in the form below.             Contact Us Enter your questions and comments in the form below. All fields are required to submit the form.   Your Name  Your Email  Phone Number  Subject  Your Message  Submit                Mellon Capital Locations San Francisco (Headquarters) 50 Fremont Street, Suite 3900 San Francisco, CA 94105 415.546.6056 Boston BNY Mellon Center 201 Washington Street Boston, MA 02108 Pittsburgh BNY Mellon Center 500 Grant Street Pittsburgh, PA 15258                        Our Management Team    Our management team is committed to continuing to lead through innovation and intellectual curiosity.   Learn more                      Our Business Development Team    We are dedicated to building and retaining successful relationships with our clients. Contact us for information on any of our investment products.   Contact us                      In the News    Fortune and ALPFA name Gabriela Parcella third among corporate America's 50 most powerful Latinas.   Learn more                            Contact Us  Headquarters 50 Fremont Street Suite 3900 San Francisco, CA 94105 415.546.6056      About Us    Our Management Team        Strategies    Active Equity     Alternatives     Asset Allocation     Fixed Income     Indexing     Responsible Investing          Insights     Press     Careers    Disclosures     Privacy Statement     Security Notice     Terms of Use     Customer Complaints                             

Mellon Capital Management Corp 50 Fremont St San Francisco, CA Investments - MapQuest







































































































    Mellon Capital Management Corp
  

50 Fremont St

San Francisco
CA
94105




 Reviews



(415) 546-6056
Website

        Menu & Reservations
      



            Make Reservations 




            Order Online
          

            Tickets
          




          Tickets
        


        See Availability
      





      Nearby
    


      Directions
    


    {{::location.tagLine.value.text}}
  



Sponsored Topics








































See a problem?
Let us know!


  
  
            Mellon Capital Management, a Bank of New York Mellon Corporation company, is a leading innovator in the investment industry. The company manages global quantitative strategies for institutional investors. In the past decade, the firm has extended its domestic allocation approach to include global markets. It capitalizes on pricing inefficiencies across currencies, countries and asset classes. Mellon Capital Management s reputation is founded in its domestic asset allocation and indexing strategies. Its systematic investment approach is based on sound financial theory, classical valuation methods and a research-driven process. In addition to its strategies and risk management techniques, the company offers transition management and securities lending services. Mellon Capital Management is based in San Francisco.
          






















Legal






Help























William Cazalet, Mellon Capital Management Corp: Profile & Biography - Bloomberg


































































  








































Feedback





William "Will" Cazalet

Mng Dir/Head:Active Equity Strategies,
Mellon Capital Management Corp






Career History




Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Diversified Emerging Markets Fund, 2/2016-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
HC Capital Trust - The Esg Growth Portfolio, 7/2015-PRESENT


Member:Fund Management Team
BNY Mellon International Appreciation Fund, 7/2015-PRESENT


Member:Fund Management Team
BNY Mellon International Equity Income Fund, 7/2015-PRESENT


Member:Fund Management Team
BNY Mellon Asset Allocation Fund, 7/2015-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
BNY Mellon Large Cap Stock Fund, 3/2015-PRESENT


Portfolio Manager
Dreyfus Corp, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Structured Mid Cap Fund, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Active Midcap Fund, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Equity Income Fund, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Strat Beta EM, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Strategic Beta Global Equity Fund, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Opportunity Funds- Dreyfus Strategic Beta U.S. Equity Fund, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member: Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Sustainable US Equity Fund Inc, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member:Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Investment Portfolios Midcap Stock Portfolio, 12/2014-PRESENT


Member:Fund Management Team
Dreyfus Socially Responsible Growth Fund, 12/2014-PRESENT


Mng Dir/Head:Active Equity Strategies
Mellon Capital Management Corp, 7/2013-PRESENT


Managing Director
Commonfund, 11/2011-6/2013



Morgan Stanley, FORMER


Show More







Corporate Information
Address:



Phone:
-


Fax:
-











From The Web












Personal Information



Education



Stanford Graduate School of Business
Master's Degree, Management


University of Cambridge
Master's Degree








Awards & Publications



Certificates




Chartered Management Accountant (CMA)




Chartered Alternative Investment Analyst (CAIA)









Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data

































Mellon Capital Management Corp. : Top Money Managers  



BNY Mellon Investment Management - Institutional Investors















 

 





	We use cookies to improve your experience on our websites. By continuing you are giving consent to cookies being used.   Learn More

Close








Institutional Investors and Consultants

Solutions for


							Cash Management Professionals


							Financial Advisors


							Individual Investors


							Institutional Investors and Consultants


Close





United States


Please select your country



								United States


Close

















Skip to content
Toggle Site Nav



STRATEGIES


INSIGHTS

Back



All Insights by Theme

Back



Planet DC TM">Planet DC TM

Back



Thematic Insights

									Points of view to help our clients navigate the complex issues and challenges they face today								
READ MORE




Planet DC TM

									Your destination for distinctive retirement thinking – addressing the pressing challenges of plan sponsors and advisors.								
READ MORE





WHO WE SERVE


WHY INVEST WITH US

Back



Our History

Back



Company Profile

Back




INVESTMENT BOUTIQUES

Back



INVESTMENT MANAGEMENTLEADERSHIP

Back




Environmental, Social and Governance (ESG)

Back



Fiduciary & Multi-Asset Solutions

Back



BNY Mellon

									230 Years of Looking Ahead								
See our timeline







Toggle Search


close







Products 




 






All Results 























Welcome Institutional Investors & Consultants

At BNY Mellon, we believe in specialist investment boutiques where enlightened thinking flourishes.










We Are An Independent Family Of
Global Boutiques

The speed and complexity of today’s investing world is best navigated by looking at challenges and opportunities from many points of view. We accomplish this through our independent boutiques.

Learn More 









Thematic Insights

The complexities of today’s investing world are best navigated by looking at challenges and opportunities from many points of view. We distill these points of view into key themes to help our clients navigate the complex issues and challenges they face today.

EXPLORE INSIGHTS









Artificial Intelligence: The Shape Of Things To Come?


LEARN MORE









Emerging Markets: Trade War Victim Or Growth Engine?


LEARN MORE











Who We Are
BNY Mellon Investment Management is one of the world’s largest multi-boutique investment managers, encompassing BNY Mellon’s 13 diversified investment boutiques, wealth management business and Dreyfus, a leading North American mutual fund company and cash management business. We combine the scale of a full-service investment manager with the focused expertise of  investment boutiques, each with their own style, strategy and management team.
With solutions for virtually every risk profile, strategy and asset class, we work across the investment spectrum to offer clients a diverse portfolio that fosters innovation and financial performance across cycles. The affiliation with BNY Mellon, coupled with Investment Management’s nimble platform, seeks to deliver leading investment solutions to clients.




Our Four Core Principles








1


MULTIPLE PERSPECTIVESThe speed and complexity of today’s investing world is best navigated by looking at challenges and opportunities from many points of view.  We accomplish through our 13 independent boutiques. 

2


INGENUITY EVERYWHEREOur boutiques’ operational independence—combined with the kind of global research and resources that can be provided by one of the world’s top 10 investment managers—attract some of our industry’s best and brightest minds. 

3


ENTREPRENEURIAL THINKINGOur boutiques each have a culture in which entrepreneurial spirit is both expected and rewarded.  Our investment experts take personal ownership in creating strategies and products that will make a significant impact in the markets. 

4


INTELLECTUAL RIGORWe believe in innovative ideas, not reckless ones.  New investing strategies are subjected to intense scrutiny within our boutiques, then tested using advanced technologies and proprietary data from around the globe.








Our Investment Boutiques
Great minds don't think alike: the power of independent thinking.(AUM data as of Q1 2017)
 



$31.5 BILLIONGlobal sub-investment grade debt asset management



$5.7 BILLIONReal estate investment specialist driven by data and analytics



$2.9 BILLIONBrazilian equity; long/short; macro and fixed income strategies



$220.2 BILLIONFull array of money market funds and select offshore liquidity funds





$39.7 BILLIONResearch-driven active equity manager



$8.6 BILLIONU.S. and global real asset investment management



$4.3 BILLIONFund of hedge funds; non-proprietary manager of managers



$683.5 BILLIONLeader in global fixed income, risk management solutions and absolute return investing





$359.6 BILLIONFundamentals-based systematic investing; solutions spanning multi-asset, active equity, smart beta and indexing



$67.3 BILLIONActive manager of equity, bond, multi-asset, real return and income solutions, underpinned by a distinctive global thematic framework



$11.5 BILLIONMulti-strategy private equity investing; direct investment and multi-manager funds



$154.9 BILLIONA leading fixed income and credit specialist





$61.5 BILLIONGlobal equity investment manager






Who We Serve
We provide clients with strategies and solutions that seek to meet their investment objectives in any market environment.









Consultants


 


Corporate Defined Benefit Plans


 


Defined Contribution


 


Endowments & Foundations


 


Public Funds


 


Taft-Hartley Plans









LEARN MORE ABOUT WHO WE SERVE



Thematic Insights
The complexities of today’s investing world are best navigated by looking at challenges and opportunities from many points of view. We distill these points of view into key themes to help our clients navigate the complex issues and challenges they face today.









MARKETS & ECONOMY

June 2017
Artificial Intelligence: The Shape Of Things To Come?



Newton assesses some key geopolitical headwinds facing European investors and their potential market impacts.



 


FIXED INCOME

June 2017
Slowdown and Upset Ahead



Newton assesses some key geopolitical headwinds facing European investors and their potential market impacts.



 


EQUITIES

June 2017
Does Your Manager Have FOMO—Fear of Missing Out?



Picking out the next big growth company is what many hope for but few achieve. Newton highlights why an income manager thinks differently and how that may suit investors in the current climate.



 


EQUITIES

June 2017
Emerging Markets: Trade War Victim or Growth Engine?



Newton discusses why there is reason to be positive on developing economies and what sectors could be beneficiaries of change.






Fixed Income

June 2017
A Rising-Yield Survival Kit 



A look back at an eventful year in fixed income and, with a more volatile period likely to unfold over 2017, Paul Brain, Newton Investment Management’s global dynamic bond strategy portfolio manager, offers seven tools for trying to cope with a change in prospects for bond markets.






MULTI-ASSET

June 2017
Market Moves: What Lies Beneath



Rising stock markets and positive data point to growing confidence in a global economic recovery but scratch the surface and a far darker picture emerges.








VIEW MORE INSIGHTS







			Strategies at a Glance
		

BNY Mellon offers a wide range of investment management expertise across equity, fixed income and alternative asset classes. Our strategies may be available in separate accounts, institutional vehicles and mutual funds.

LEARN MORE

 





			Environmental, Social and Governance (ESG)
		

Responsible investing that integrates ESG factors can give investors an enhanced understanding of portfolio risk by identifying and addressing ESG risks which may provide ways to align their investments with their institutional values.

LEARN MORE

 





			Fiduciary & Multi-Asset Solutions
		

BNY Mellon offers customized outcome-oriented fiduciary and multi-asset solutions that seek to meet the needs of clients’ risk and return objectives.

LEARN MORE


BNY Mellon Investment Management is one of the world's leading investment management organizations and one of the top U.S. wealth managers, encompassing BNY Mellon's affiliated investment management firms, wealth management organization and global distribution companies. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation and may also be used as a generic term to reference the Corporation as a whole or its various subsidiaries generally.
Please consult a legal, tax or investment advisor in order to determine whether an investment product or service is appropriate for a particular situation.
Alcentra Limited, Insight Investment Management Limited, Newton Capital Management Limited, Newton Investment Management Limited and Walter Scott & Partners Limited are authorized and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority. The registered address for Alcentra Limited is 10 Gresham Street, London, EC2V7JD, England. The registered address for Insight Investment and Newton is BNY Mellon Centre, 160 Queen Victoria Street, London, EC4V 4LA, England. The registered address for Walter Scott is One Charlotte Square, Edinburgh, EH2 4DR, Scotland.
Amherst Capital Management LLC is a real estate investment specialist. Amherst Capital was established in 2014 as a majority-owned subsidiary of BNY Mellon, and is minority-owned by Amherst Holdings, LLC a financial services holding company with more than a 10 year history of utilizing its mortgage expertise to assist clients in navigating the real estate capital markets. Amherst Holdings is not an affiliate of BNY Mellon.
BNY Mellon ARX is the brand used to describe the Brazilian investment capabilities of BNY Mellon ARX Investimentos Ltda.
BNY Mellon Cash Investment Strategies (CIS) is a division of The Dreyfus Corporation.
Investment advisory services in North America are provided through four different SEC-registered investment advisers using the brand Insight Investment: Cutwater Asset Management Corp., Cutwater Investor Services Corp., Pareto New York LLC and Pareto Investment Management Limited. The Insight Investment Group includes Insight Investment Management (Global) Limited, Pareto Investment Management Limited, Insight Investment Funds Management Limited, Cutwater Asset Management Corp. and Cutwater Investor Services Corp.
BNY Mellon owns a majority of The Boston Company Asset Management, LLC and the remainder is owned by employees of the firm.
Mellon Capital Management Corporation ("Mellon Capital") is an investment adviser registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940. Mellon Capital is a wholly-owned indirect subsidiary of BNY Mellon. The firm is defined as Mellon Capital and includes assets managed as dual officers of BNY Mellon and as dual employees of The Dreyfus Corporation.
“Newton” and/or the “Newton Investment Management” brand refers to the following group of affiliated companies: Newton Investment Management Limited, Newton Investment Management (North America) Limited (NIMNA Ltd) and Newton Investment Management (North America) LLC (NIMNA LLC). NIMNA LLC personnel are supervised persons of NIMNA Ltd and NIMNA LLC does not provide investment advice, all of which is conducted by NIMNA Ltd. NIMNA LLC and NIMNA Ltd are the only Newton companies to offer services in the U.S. Newton is a wholly owned subsidiary of the Bank of New York Mellon Corporation.
BNY Mellon owns a 20% interest in Siguler Guff & Company, LP and certain related entities (including Siguler Guff Advisers, LLC).
MARK-2016-11-11-0729






This link directs you to a third-party website. Dreyfus accepts no responsibility for content on these third-party sites or for the services provided. Also, please be aware that when you use services provided by one of these third-party sites, you're subject to that site's terms of service and privacy policy rules (i.e., sharing of personal information), which you should review carefully before proceeding.

				Yes
					No





 



  





Mellon Capital Management Corp 1 Boston Pl Boston, MA Investments - MapQuest







































































































    Mellon Capital Management Corp
  

1 Boston Pl

Boston
MA
02108




 Reviews



(617) 248-4500
Website

        Menu & Reservations
      



            Make Reservations 




            Order Online
          

            Tickets
          




          Tickets
        


        See Availability
      





      Nearby
    


      Directions
    


    {{::location.tagLine.value.text}}
  



Sponsored Topics








































See a problem?
Let us know!


  
  
            Mellon Capital Management, a Bank of New York Mellon Corporation company, is a leading innovator in the investment industry. The company manages global quantitative strategies for institutional investors. In the past decade, the firm has extended its domestic allocation approach to include global markets. It capitalizes on pricing inefficiencies across currencies, countries and asset classes. Mellon Capital Management s reputation is founded in its domestic asset allocation and indexing strategies. Its systematic investment approach is based on sound financial theory, classical valuation methods and a research-driven process. In addition to its strategies and risk management techniques, the company offers transition management and securities lending services. Mellon Capital Management is based in San Francisco with a location in Boston.
          






















Legal






Help






































Melon Capital Management: Investment Manager Highlight (BK) | Investopedia




















































































 























Topics



What's New



McDonald's, NVIDIA, AMD May Surge on Weak Dollar




AT&T's Quarterly Profit Tops Wall St Estimates


Topics

News
Financial Advisors
Markets
Anxiety Index
Investing
Managing Wealth
ETFs
The Trump Economy
Retirement
Personal Finance
Trading
ETFs Made Simple
Tech
Life Stages
Small Business
Bitcoin





Reference



Dictionary
Term Of The Day

Ponzi Scheme
A fraudulent investing scam promising high rates of return with little risk to investors. ... 
Read More »



Broker Reviews




Find the best broker for your trading or investing needs
See Reviews



Latest Videos


Are Bezos & Musk's Rocketships Bad for Markets?


Guides

Stock Basics
Economics Basics
Options Basics


Exam Prep

Series 7 Exam
CFA Level 1
Series 65 Exam





Advisors




Advisor Insights
Our network of expert financial advisors field questions from our community.
Ask A Question



Join Advisor Insights
Are you a financial advisor? Showcase your expertise to 20+ million investors.
Join Now



Financial Advisors
Sophisticated content for financial advisors around investment strategies, industry trends, and advisor education.


Find an Advisor

Atlanta
Los Angeles
Boston
New York
Houston





Markets




Markets
The latest markets news, real time quotes, financials and more.



Watchlist
Track stocks and ETFs
Add New Watchlist





Simulator




Stock Simulator
Trade with a starting balance of $100,000 and zero risk!



FX Trader
Trade the Forex market risk free using our free Forex trading simulator.






NEW
                                Academy
                            




Investopedia Academy
Learn from the world's leader in financial education
Check out all courses


Featured Courses



Become a day trader
Start Learning



Excel for Finance
Start Learning



Latest Courses

Become a Day Trader
Excel for Finance
Coming soon: Fundamental Investing
Coming soon: Financial Modeling
All Courses






















Site Log In


Advisor Insights Log In



Newsletters























                Melon Capital Management: Investment Manager Highlight (BK)            


    By J. William Carpenter | March 18, 2016 — 7:12 AM EDT    






Share
























































Mellon Capital Management Corp. is a global asset manager offering a diverse range of investment strategies to institutional investors, including pension plans, charitable foundations, sovereign wealth funds and financial intermediaries. Its offerings include active, indexing, multi-asset and custom beta investment strategies, with options across all major asset classes. The company is a subsidiary of the Bank of New York Mellon Corp. (NYSE: BK), also known as BNY Mellon. As of Jan. 31, 2016, it has more than $329 billion in assets under management.
Firm Background
Mellon Capital Management originated as a Mellon Bank subsidiary in 1983, founded by Bill Fouse and Tom Loeb, who were two early proponents of index investing at Wells Fargo in the 1970s. Fouse is credited with a number of other important innovations, including the integration of the dividend discount model with the capital asset pricing model, and the development of tactical asset allocation (TAA), an active management portfolio strategy in wide use today.
Mellon Capital Management continued delivering innovative strategies and unique investment insights under the influence of its founders, launching its first global TAA strategy in 1990, its first active currency strategy in 1995, and its first hedge fund in 2001. After more than 30 years in operation, the firm has reached global scale while remaining dedicated to innovation, strategic flexibility and research-based decision making.
Product Overview
Mellon Capital Management offers indexed and actively managed strategy options covering equities and fixed income investments. Its equity indexing strategies provide targeted exposure to a wide range of industrial sectors, geographic regions, investment styles and market capitalizations. Seven equity strategies are available, including US., global and emerging market strategies founded on fundamental analysis and disciplined risk management. Fixed income strategies include sector-specific options, as well as US. and international strategies.
Mellon Capital Management's asset allocation strategies are designed to meet particular investor objectives through active management. The firm's total return strategies seek to deliver equity-like returns with reduced risk and superior downside protection. Domestic and global TAA strategies target alpha through a portfolio of equities, bonds and currencies tailored to fit client investment objectives.
A variety of outcome-driven custom beta solutions are also available to meet diverse investor needs. Mellon Capital Management analysts meet with clients to define an investment objective, then develop a strategy to accomplish the objective. The firm employs a number of basic design approaches for custom beta products depending on client needs, including smart beta strategies, rules-based strategies and fundamentally weighted approaches. It also offers strategies for clients seeking socially responsible investment options.
Executive Leadership
Gabriela Franco Parcella has served as chairwoman, president and chief executive officer (CEO) of Mellon Capital Management since 2011. She has expanded the firm's global operations and has overseen a $100 billion increase in assets under management. Prior to taking leadership of the firm, Parcella served as executive vice president and chief operating officer (COO) from 2007 to 2011. She originally joined the firm as a lawyer. She completed bachelor's and master's degrees in accounting at the University of Texas at Austin, then earned a law degree at Stanford Law School.
Jeff Zhang is executive vice president and chief investment officer (CIO) of Mellon Capital Management, with overall responsibility for the firm's mix of investment strategies. He also has direct management responsibility for its active portfolio management teams, as well as its research and trading divisions. Zhang became CIO in 2011, after serving as head of asset allocation for the firm. Before joining Mellon Capital Management, he co-founded a boutique asset management firm and worked as an equity research analyst at Salomon Smith Barney. He completed an MBA degree at Yale University.









  






 









STOCKS: 
BK 




































      Trending
    



The Trump Economy: News and Analysis




Announcing the Top 100 Most Influential Financial Advisors




Who is Anthony Scaramucci?




Why Retiring on 70% of Your Income Might Be Tough




Investopedia's Guide to Impact Investing















Trading Center















Partner Links



















Want to learn how to invest?
Get a free 10 week email series that will teach you how to start investing.
Delivered twice a week, straight to your inbox.









No thanks, I prefer not making money.



























 

Dictionary:
#
a
b
c
d
e
f
g
h
i
j
k
l
m
n
o
p
q
r
s
t
u
v
w
x
y
z




Content Library
Articles
Terms
Videos
Guides
Slideshows
FAQs
Calculators
Chart Advisor
Stock Analysis
Stock Simulator
FXtrader
Exam Prep Quizzer
Net Worth Calculator




Connect With Investopedia
























Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers




Get Free Newsletters
Newsletters









Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers



© 2017, Investopedia, LLC.

All Rights Reserved
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy































Mellon Capital Management Corp.












































 















The Money Manager People TM














Money Manager Performance Research Center

















< Research another Money Manager

Performance, Research and Ranking for Mellon Capital Management Corp., Updated 6/30/2017









































Money Manager Reports Include:

Performance Annually
Risk Reward Analysis
Money Manager Review
Money Manager Ranking









Here's how it works:

Fill in the form on this page.
We'll contact you shortly to learn about your interest in this manager.
Our Wealth Managers will prepare your requested reports and maybe a few additional ones that fit your investment criteria and objectives.
Your Money Manager Reports will be delivered to you by email.











Request your FREE Reports










Or call one of our Wealth Managers for more detailed information 
(800) 541-7774Your information is secure. 















In the meantime, here's some basic information about Mellon Capital Management Corp.


Company Information:



Name:
Mellon Capital Management Corp.


Address:
50 Fremont StreetSuite 3900San Francisco, CA 94105


Phone:
(415)546-6056


Website:
www.mcm.com





Company Products:

Active Index Plus Strategy
Active Bond Strategy (CF)
Active Currency
EAFE Indexing (CF)
EB 130/30 Enhanced Equity Strategy
EB Aggregate Bond Index (CF)
Enhanced Asset Allocation (CF)
Global Alpha—Low Restriction Comp.
Global Alpha - Unrestricted Composit
Large Cap Stock Index Fund (CF)
Long/Short Alpha Fund (CF)
Market Completion (CF)
S&P 500 Indexing (CF)
Small Cap Stock Index Fund (CF)
Tactical Asset Allocation (CF)




Mellon Capital Management Corp. Commentary







< Research another Money Manager











Any money management or investment advisory firms listed on this website are not related entities of WrapManager, Inc. and are listed for convenience and informational purposes only. The listing of a money manager on this website does not imply a solicitation or recommendation of the money manager. WrapManager, Inc. is responsible only for the content of this website and it has no control over other websites that may be accessible from this website, the contents therein or the products/services offered by third parties. Hyperlinks to or from this website do not constitute third party endorsement of, sponsorship by or affiliation with WrapManager, Inc.
 







 



Important Disclosure | Privacy Policy  WrapManager, Inc., 703 Market Street, 18th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94103 (800) 541-7774 toll-free  | (415) 541-9760 fax | Click to email us © 2017 WrapManager, Inc. All Rights Reserved. WrapManager is an SEC-registered investment adviser.  (1) qualified investors are those with $500K or more in investable assets






































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Online Corporation Formation 










































 888-462-3453






 888-462-3453




Review Entity Types



Review Entity Types
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Nonprofit





Manage your company





Managing Your Company
Annual Report
Foreign Qualification
EIN / Tax ID Number
Certificate of Good Standing
Change of Registered Agent





Registered Agent

Amendment
Dissolution
Corporate / LLC Kit
Business License Research
File Business Taxes







Learning center



Blog
Research Tools
State Filing Times
State Filing Prices
Ongoing Filing Requirements
Help Center
Entity Comparison Chart
LLC State Information
Corporation State Information




about




About Us

Why Choose Us
Testimonials
Contact




Dashboard login
Incorporate now















Form your Corporation in 5 minutes or less!

$49 + State Fee & Free 1st Year Registered Agent.
Start My C Corporation












A corporation is a type of entity that is formed and regulated on a state level. The corporation is formed by filing Articles of Incorporation with the Secretary of State within the state of incorporation. Ownership in a corporation is expressed through the issuance of shares while the management of the corporation is governed by a board of directors who are elected by the shareholders.The board of directors select officers who manage the day to day activities of the corporation. The board of directors also will draft bylaws for the corporation Bylaws are basically written protocols that define the way that the corporation will be governed. Corporations are required to hold annual meetings for both the shareholders and the board of directors. The annual meetings are held to discuss and decide on important decisions that are faced by the corporation. 








Select preferred state of incorporation to review detailed information.











Select State








 Filing Time & Price 


State Fee
: 


State Filing Time
: 


Expedited Filing Time
: 














How our service works.
Take a moment to view our instructional video and see how easy it can be to get your business incorporated.
View









 Compliance Requirements 













Select the package that works best for you.



silver
$49
+ $163 (state fee)
show more


The Basics To Get You Started
Preliminary company name clearance and filing of Articles of Organization.


FREE Registered Agent for 1st Year

Registered Agent service includes 1 full year not the typical 6 months that some of our competitors advertise.



Lifetime Customer Support
You get lifetime customer support and our 100% satisfaction guarantee.

show less

get started




Gold
$149
+ $163 (state fee)
everything from silver+
show more


EIN / Tax ID Number
Providing an EIN is required to open a  business bank account and is required to  file business tax returns.


Personalized Operating Agreement
Includes most common provisions to protect members from liability

show less

get started





Platinum
$299
+ $163 (state fee)
everything from silver & gold+
show more


Expedited Filing
Expedited processing speeds the turn-
around time for your order.


Customized LLC Kit
Personalized slip binder and embossed seal with your company name and date of fomation.


FedEx Delivery
Faster mailing option that includes a track number.

show less

get started







Included in all of our packages



 Verify Company Name Availability
 Preparation & Filing of Articles
 Next Business Day Processing




 Registered Agent Service (1st Year FREE)
 Lifetime Company Alerts
 Online Order Status Tracking




 Free Business Tax Consultation
 Lifetime Customer Support
 Online Access to Incorporation Documents






Launch Your Business Only $49 + State Fee.

Clear Pricing. No Contracts. No Surprises.

see detailed pricing







Commonly Asked Questions for starting a C Corporation




 Are Non-U.S. Residents Allowed to Own a Corporation or LLC?

There are no citizenship or residence requirements for ownership of a C Corporation or an LLC. The S-Corporation however does not allow nonresident aliens to be shareholders (owner), but any US citizen or resident alien may be a shareholder (owner). You would, of course, require an in state street address for the state to forward official legal and tax correspondence including service of process, known as the registered agent address, but neither residency nor citizenship is required for ownership of a C Corporation or an LLC.



 In What State Should I Form my LLC or Corporation?

Unless you plan on having a large, multi-state operation, it is generally best to form your company in the state in which it is located.Generally speaking, most states will expect you to be registered with them if there is substantial ongoing business and/or a physical presence in that state. If you do form your company in a state other than the one in which your company is located, you may ultimately need to register your company as a foreign (out of state) company with your home state, which will subject you to all of the fees, taxes, and regulations of that state.



 What are the Differences Between Officers, Directors and Shareholders?

A corporation consists of all three: officers, directors and shareholders. Shareholders are the owners of the corporation and elect the directors. Directors guide and are involved in the fundamental decisions of the corporation on behalf of the shareholders. Officers are selected by the directors and run the day-to-day operations of the corporation. These do not need to be separate people. Any person can fill all three positions. In small businesses, one person can be the only shareholder, the only director, and the only officer.





 What is a C Corporation?


A C Corporation is a completely separate tax and legal entity from its owners, and owners who work in the business are treated and taxed as employees of the corporation (Note: The "C" in C Corporation refers to a sub chapter of the tax code; C Corporations are one of the most common forms of corporations, and they are frequently referred to generically as corporations).
C Corporations are subject to corporate income taxes separate from the owners, where most other forms of business entity allow for the company profits to "pass-through" to the personal income tax statements of the owners. As such, C Corporations are the most formal business entity and they have greater tax reporting responsibilities than other business entities. C Corporations allow for profits to be retained in the business, if desired, and frequently these profits can be taxed at a lower rate than personal income. C Corporations can also pay out after tax profits to its owners in the form of dividends, but this can also lead to double taxation.



 What is Stock Par Value?

Par value is a nominal dollar amount given to corporate shares. It doesn't necessarily reflect their real value, and is typically set at a low value (i.e. one dollar or one cent). The par value of a share is the minimum price at which it may be sold to shareholders, and the par value must be the same for all shares of the same class. The shares can be sold to the initial shareholders, at par value or more, but the price must be the same for each share. Not all states require a par value. Unless you specify otherwise, IncFile will authorize 1500 shares (this is due to the fact that 1500 is easily divisible by 2, 3, 4, 5, 6) with a par value of one cent, or at no par value if not required by your state.



 What are Bylaws?

The bylaws of a corporation are an internal document that contains rules for holding corporate meetings and carrying out other formalities according to state corporate laws. Bylaws are not filed with the state.





Learn more about C Corporations











Questions? Visit the Help Center or get in touch:

 888.462.3453 support@incfile.com




 
 
 
 
 
 













 Watch how it works
 Watch how to save money with incfile
































entity types

LLC
S-Corporation
C-Corporation
Nonprofit



quick links

Home
Review entity types
Manage your company
Check order status
learn more
pricing
Blog
About



services

Registered Agent
Annual report
Certificate of Good Standing
Change of Registered Agent
Foreign Qualification
Amendment
Dissolution
EIN/Tax ID Number
Business License Search
File Business Taxes



resources

Renew Registered Agent
Filing Times
Why Choose Us
Testimonials
Entity Comparison Chart
LLC State Info
Corporation State Info
Corporate/LLC Kit











© 2017 Copyright Incfile.com. All Rights Reserved. 
Contact
Affiliates
Sitemap
Privacy Policy
Legal Disclaimer
Glossary






































Order Now













































Start your business in 3 easy steps

Get started by making your selections








1




Entity Type
LLCS-CorporationC-CorporationNonprofit 







2




Formation State
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWashington DCWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 
















3
select a package


5 reasons to start your business with confidence.

 Lifetime Customer Support
 A+ Rating with BBB
 Registered Agent - 1st Year Free
 Online Access to Incorporation Documents
 Over 100,000+ Company Formations
Since 2004


 Watch how to save money with Incfile






silver



Package 

$59



State Fee 

$59



$
49

+ state fee




Get Started





gold



Package
$59


State Fee
$59



$
149

+ state fee




Get Started





platinum



Package
$59


State Fee
$59



$
299

+ state fee




Get Started
















What are the ongoing compliance requirements in  ?





Make your selections to view the ongoing compliance requirements for your state.








1




Entity Type
LLCS-CorporationC-CorporationNonprofit 







2




Formation State
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWashington DCWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 





















llc services





silver


gold


platinum









Prepare & File the Articles of Organization



We will review the information, prepare your incorporation documents, and send them to the
state of formation.


























Certified Copy - Articles of Organization




That Certified Copy is an additional document that will be included with the filed Articles
for your company. It is from the Colorado Secretary of State and it is electronically signed and affixed with the Colorado State Seal and the signature of the Secretary. This provides additional supporting documentation as to the official nature of the filing.


























Certified Copy - Articles of Organization




That Certified Copy is an additional document that will be included with the filed Articles
for your company. It is from the California Secretary of State and it is electronically signed and affixed with the California State Seal and the signature of the Secretary. This provides additional supporting documentation as to the official nature of the filing.


























CL-1 Preparation & filing of the Initial Annual Report.




When filing for a corporation in South Carolina, the SC Secretary of State requires that an initial annual report be filed along with the necessary corporate charter documents. This initial report is the Form CL-1, and the state charges a fee of $25 for this in addition to the standard state corporate filing fee. We prepare and submit the Form CL-1 along with the Articles of Incorporation and all fees as required by the state for your new corporation.


























Preparation & filing of the Initial Annual Report




When filing for a new business in Washington, the WA Secretary of State requires that an initial annual report be filed along with the necessary corporate charter documents. The state charges a fee of $10 for this in addition to the standard state filing fee. We prepare and submit the initial Annual Report along with the Articles of Incorporation and all fees as required by the state for your new business entity.


























IRS Form 2553 Preparation



The 2553 Form, known as the Subchapter S election (or Election for Small Business), is required to be filed with the IRS to obtain S-Corporation status for purposes of federal taxation. Filing this Form with the IRS is used to convert a C-Corporation into an S-Corporation. IncFile.com will prepare the form and forward it to you (as it requires the signatures of the initial shareholders), along with instructions that include where to sign and submit the form.

IMPORTANT: Please note the Form 2553 is time sensitive and must be filed with the IRS within 75 days of your corporation filing date in order to obtain S-corporation tax status for the current year.



























NYS Form CT-6 Preparation



Unlike most states, New York has a state level of S-Corporation tax status, similar to the Federal S-corporation tax status. A Federal S-corporation may (but is not required to) elect to be taxed as a New York S-corporation by filing Form CT‑6 . When S-corporation is selected as the entity type, IncFile.com will also prepare the form CT-6 for your corporation, along with the Federal S-corporation election, free of charge. NOTE: The form will require the signature(s) of the initial shareholders. IncFile.com will prepare this form and return it to you with your filed corporation, and it will just need to be signed and dated where indicated, and submitted to the state (included with the instructions).

IMPORTANT: Please note the Form CT-6 is time sensitive and must be filed with the the state within 75 days of your corporation filing date in order to obtain the NYS S-corporation tax status for the current year.


























Unlimited Name Availability Searches



We conduct a thorough name search with the state corporation database and will work with you
as
long as needed to find an available company
name.


























Registered Agent Service for 1 Full Year 



SPECIAL OFFER





Every new incorporation order is eligible for 1 full year of FREE
Registered Agent service.

As your Registered Agent, we will use our address to accept official legal correspondence
and
then deliver it to you. This is an invaluable
service that will eliminate junk mail and limit personal information available to third
parties.

Important: Registered Agent service is included on all packages for 1 full year not the
typical
6 months that some of our competitors
advertise. At the end of the year you will be invoiced and have the option to renew or
cancel
service. Your payment card will never be billed
without you expressed consent.

The annual fee for Registered Agent service is $99.







FREE




FREE




FREE








Certificate of Good Standing




The Certificate of Good standing is a certificate that is issued by the state that certifies
that the corporation or LLC is active and in
compliance with all of the state requirements as of the date on the certificate. This can be
used as additional supporting documentation when
opening a bank account or in other activities establishing your company, and is typically
required if seeking foreign qualification in any
other state.

























Statement and
Resignation
of the Organizer



The Statement and Resignation of the Organizer is a document signed by the Organizer which
identifies the initial members of the Limited Liability Company. A
signed statement will be included with your filing packet and can be used to assist in the
establishment of a business checking account.

























Unlimited Phone & Email Support



We are always here to help no matter how long ago you placed your order, whether you have a
general question or need a copy of a previously
filed document.


























Online Order Status Tracking

VIEW EXAMPLE





This feature allows you to review the status of your order in real time.


























Business Tax Consultation





Incorporating a new business can burden owners with complicated tax filings . As a client
you
are entitled to receive a free no obligation 1 hour consultation with a certified tax professional who can answer questions regarding the
tax
commitments of your company.

























Next Business Day Processing



We strive to ensure that every order received is prepared and forwarded to the state within
1
business day.
























Lifetime Company Alerts



Never miss an important filing date again. Lifetime Company Alerts is designed to send email
notifications informing clients of compulsory
state filings such as Annual Reports, Business Licenses, Statement of Information etc.
























Online Access to Incorporation Documents



You will be able to access your incorporation documents online 24/7. You can also download your documents at anytime you wish, review company information, and track all orders in real-time.





























llc premium services





silver


gold


platinum









Employer Identification Number/ Tax ID 
(Highly Recommended)




An Employer Identification Number (EIN) is a nine-digit number that is assigned by the IRS
and
used to identify taxpayers. Providing an EIN is
required to open a business bank account and is required to file business tax returns. We
will
apply and obtain your EIN from the IRS
electronically. This option is the fastest way to obtain the EIN.









+ $70






FREE




FREE








Operating Agreement



The operating agreement for a limited liability company is a private agreement between
the
members/owners of the LLC, and it details the
ownership, rights, and responsibilities of the LLC members. The operating agreement we
provide for your use covers all of the most
commonly used provisions and will be customized based on your specific company
information
provided during the placing of your order.










+ $40





















Corporation Bylaws



The bylaws of a corporation are an internal document that details the operating rules
for
the corporation. The bylaws of a corporation are
typically adopted at the organizational meeting of the board of directors after the
corporation has been filed with the state. The bylaws
we will provide for your use cover all of the most commonly used provisions and will be
customized based on your specific company
information.










+ $30



















Corporation Organizational Meeting Minutes



After the corporation has been filed with the state, the directors of the corporation
are
required to have a "first," or organizational
meeting to take care of things such as issuing shares of stock, adopting bylaws,
appointing
officers, etc., and keeping minutes of
directors meetings and corporate resolutions is a required part of your internal
corporate
compliance. The organizational minutes we
provide for your use cover all of the most commonly used provisions and will be
customized
based on your specific company information.










+ $25






















Corporate Forms CD / Bylaws Minutes




The forms CD includes, customizable templates of documents needed for compliance,
record-keeping and meeting business formalities, such as
operating agreements, organizational minutes and bylaws.

Corporate Forms:

Bylaws
Consent by Incorporator
Resignation of Incorporator
Waiver of Notice
Minutes of an Organizational Meeting
Consent in Lieu of Organizational Meeting
Investment Representation Letter











+ $30





















Banking Resolution




The banking resolution is a resolution which may be adopted by the members to authorize the
opening of a bank account, and it also designates
who has signature authority for the bank account.










+ $35




















Business Website & Domain Name
find out more




An email will be sent after your filing is completed. You have the option to redeem a domain
name and website that will be user-friendly on all devices and give your business a professional appearance. 
All websites are subject to snipermonkey.com's hosting rates.









+ $499









+ $499















Contract Library




Your search for the right legal template stops here. Get access to 25+ high quality legal documents written by a business attorney to help aid in keeping your business contractually protected.









+ $150









+ $150






FREE








Custom Corporate / LLC Kit
LEARN MORE





The Corporate LLC/Kit is a professional
binder enclosed in a matching slip case,
customized with the name of your company on the insert. It includes a metal die-cast
corporate embossing seal, customized with the name
of your company as well as the date and state of formation spine.











+ $99






FREE




FREE












What's included with the Customized Corporate Kit
Your official state documents will be delivered in a high quality slip case
binder with your company name gold stamped along the spine.

 20 personalized stock certificates
 Stock transfer ledger
 Embossing seal
 Professional binder in a matching slip case.












MAILING OPTIONS









Electronic Delivery



As a courtesy, your filed documents will be made available online from your client dashboard
immediately upon the state returning the filed documents. You will receive a notification when your company formation documents are available.
(Included with all packages)

























Express Shipping (Tracking Number Included)




This option uses express shipping to deliver completed documents within 1 - 3 business days. (Included
with Gold and Platinum Package)









+ $25




FREE




FREE




FREE









EXPEDITED OPTIONS











Standard  State Filing Time

















-











Expedited  State Filing Time










+ $0









+ $0


















Trusted by over 100,000+
business owners since 2004.

We have dedicated much time and effort to being fully transparent by providing you exact final
pricing before getting started. We also inform you of any necessary annual filings and fees
required by the state.




 
















silver




Package



$0



State Fee


$0



$
0





Get Started





gold



Package
$0


State Fee
$0



$
0





Get Started





platinum



Package
$0


State Fee
$ 0



$
0





Get Started














Frequently Asked Questions






Does the price quoted include the state filing fee?

Yes, the price you see at the bottom of the page includes the state prescribed fee that is
required to file the Articles of Incorporation / Organization.



Should I reserve my company name before placing an order?

Absolutely not, in most cases we file the company within one day of receiving an order.
Reserving the name can hinder or delay the filing, if you have already reserved the name
please contact us immediately upon placing an order so that we can submit the filing with
the name reservation attached to the articles of formation.





Will I have the option to act as my own Registered Agent?

Yes, although we offer 1 free year of Registered Agent service you will be permitted to
provide your own Registered Agent.



Will I need to sign anything?

No, documents requiring signature will be signed by our staff. For the corporation we will
sign as the incorporator and as the organizer for an LLC.
















Merchant
Services
















Contact

|
Affiliates
|
Site Map

|
Privacy Policy

|
Legal Disclaimer

|
Glossary


























































X















 WELCOME BACK


It appears you may already have an order in progress.



Resume Order


Start Over













×
Warning!


































How can we help you?



Client Support 





Name *



Email Address *



Phone Number *



Message *





Send Message



Thanks for your message! We'll get back to you as soon as we can.

Send Other














Filing Times










































 888-462-3453






 888-462-3453




Review Entity Types



Review Entity Types
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Nonprofit





Manage your company





Managing Your Company
Annual Report
Foreign Qualification
EIN / Tax ID Number
Certificate of Good Standing
Change of Registered Agent





Registered Agent

Amendment
Dissolution
Corporate / LLC Kit
Business License Research
File Business Taxes







Learning center



Blog
Research Tools
State Filing Times
State Filing Prices
Ongoing Filing Requirements
Help Center
Entity Comparison Chart
LLC State Information
Corporation State Information




about




About Us

Why Choose Us
Testimonials
Contact




Dashboard login
Incorporate now










Easily Compare State Filing Times
Use our comparison tool to help you evaluate the processing times of each state.




*The option to expedite your Business filing with the Secretary of State will be presented within the first page of the order process.




State


Normal  Processing Time


Expedited Processing Time


Expedited  price






Select a state to review processing times and expedited pricing.




Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois




Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana




Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island




South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
Washington DC
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming










Compare another state




Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois




Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana




Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island




South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
Washington DC
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming









See full list of filing times for every state.





Which States Are Fast?

Filing Times
Expedited Time
Expedited Price















Included in all of our packages



 Verify Company Name Availability
 Preparation & Filing of Articles
 Next Business Day Processing




 Registered Agent Service (1st Year FREE)
 Lifetime Company Alerts
 Online Order Status Tracking




 Free Business Tax Consultation
 Lifetime Customer Support
 Online Access to Incorporation Documents






Launch Your Business Only $49 + State Fee.

Clear Pricing. No Contracts. No Surprises.

see detailed pricing













Questions? Visit the Help Center or get in touch:

 888.462.3453 support@incfile.com




 
 
 
 
 
 













 Watch how it works
 Watch how to save money with incfile
































entity types

LLC
S-Corporation
C-Corporation
Nonprofit



quick links

Home
Review entity types
Manage your company
Check order status
learn more
pricing
Blog
About



services

Registered Agent
Annual report
Certificate of Good Standing
Change of Registered Agent
Foreign Qualification
Amendment
Dissolution
EIN/Tax ID Number
Business License Search
File Business Taxes



resources

Renew Registered Agent
Filing Times
Why Choose Us
Testimonials
Entity Comparison Chart
LLC State Info
Corporation State Info
Corporate/LLC Kit











© 2017 Copyright Incfile.com. All Rights Reserved. 
Contact
Affiliates
Sitemap
Privacy Policy
Legal Disclaimer
Glossary




































Read reviews & testimonials for Incfile | Incfile Reviews








































 888-462-3453






 888-462-3453




Review Entity Types



Review Entity Types
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Nonprofit





Manage your company





Managing Your Company
Annual Report
Foreign Qualification
EIN / Tax ID Number
Certificate of Good Standing
Change of Registered Agent





Registered Agent

Amendment
Dissolution
Corporate / LLC Kit
Business License Research
File Business Taxes







Learning center



Blog
Research Tools
State Filing Times
State Filing Prices
Ongoing Filing Requirements
Help Center
Entity Comparison Chart
LLC State Information
Corporation State Information




about




About Us

Why Choose Us
Testimonials
Contact




Dashboard login
Incorporate now












What People Are Saying About Us
Don’t just take it from us, let our customers do the talking.









Since Incfile.com is an accredited BBB business with an A+ rating customers can be confident that they’ll get the services the expect.
- Jordan Zomes, TheBestCompanies.com














Trusted by over 100,000 business owners worldwide since 2004!

Start Your Business Now.
See Plans & Pricing
or
Explore more benefits














Questions? Visit the Help Center or get in touch:

 888.462.3453 support@incfile.com




 
 
 
 
 
 













 Watch how it works
 Watch how to save money with incfile
































entity types

LLC
S-Corporation
C-Corporation
Nonprofit



quick links

Home
Review entity types
Manage your company
Check order status
learn more
pricing
Blog
About



services

Registered Agent
Annual report
Certificate of Good Standing
Change of Registered Agent
Foreign Qualification
Amendment
Dissolution
EIN/Tax ID Number
Business License Search
File Business Taxes



resources

Renew Registered Agent
Filing Times
Why Choose Us
Testimonials
Entity Comparison Chart
LLC State Info
Corporation State Info
Corporate/LLC Kit











© 2017 Copyright Incfile.com. All Rights Reserved. 
Contact
Affiliates
Sitemap
Privacy Policy
Legal Disclaimer
Glossary

































 - APM



















Talk to an expert 855-378-0956




Looking for Qualified Property Management Companies?
We work tirelessly to find the best property managers, so you don’t have to.Please use the filter below to find a perfect match for your property.



1
2
3






What type of property do you own?



Select property type





What is the value/size of property?



Select property size





What is the zip code for the property?






Continue





Select property typeSingle Home or Condo (Valued up to $300K)Single Home or Condo ($300 to $500K)Single Home or Condo ($500K to $1 Million)Single Home or Condo (Over $1 Million)Multi-Family (2-4 units)Multi-Family (5-19 units)Multi-Family (20-99 units)Multi-Family (100+ units)Homeowners Association (2-49 units)Homeowners Association (50-99 units)Homeowners Association (100+ units)Condominium Association (2-49 units)Condominium Association (50-99 units)Condominium Association (100+ units)Retail (Up to 9,999 sqft)Retail (10,000 - 100,000 sqft)Retail (100,000+ sqft)Office (Up to 9,999 sqft)Office (10,000 - 100,000 sqft)Office (100,000+ sqft)Warehouse/Distribution (Up to 100,000 sqft)Warehouse/Distribution (100,000+ sqft)Light Manufacturing (Up to 100,000 sqft)Light Manufacturing (100,000+ sqft)Parking GarageBiotech/Mission-CriticalVacation (1-2 units)Vacation (3+ units)Other Associations (Hotel, Resort etc.)Mobile Home Community



 

Single Family Property Management | All Property Management

















 









Talk to an expert, call 855-378-0956



Single Family
Multi-Family
HOA
Commercial
Property Management  

Property Management  
Resources 
Ask A Pro 
Blog 





toggle menu

Menu









Find Single Family Property Managers Near You




Select Property Type:
Required
Property's Zip:
Required



Select property typeSingle Home or Condo (Valued up to $300K)Single Home or Condo ($300 to $500K)Single Home or Condo ($500K to $1 Million)Single Home or Condo (Over $1 Million)Vacation (1-2 units)Vacation (3+ units) 

Search


We list the best single family property managers across the country. Search our directory to find the perfect match near you!




How We Help Find Your Perfect Property Manager



Select your property's type and zip code




Review listings of top local property managers that fit your criteria




Select up to 5 and compare quotes




Discuss your unique needs with the property managers












Learn More About Professional Property Management



Do I need a property manager?
As the owner of a small-scale rental property, you may be on the fence about whether or not to use a property management company. Especially if you've never managed an income property, it can be tempting to assume that property management duties amount to "find tenants, sign lease, receive rent check," along with handling some minor maintenance issues from time to time. 
In reality, managing tenant relations, staying on the right side of the law, being on call for any emergencies that come up, staying on top of home maintenance, conducting periodic property inspections, and handling the accounting and taxes can be a time-consuming effort.
Professional property managers have developed systems that allow them to manage all of the above with maximum efficiency. Their expertise allows them to prevent problems before they arise, as well as handle any issues that do come up with minimum disruption to your revenue stream. 



View More



 

Is property management affordable for single-family rental owners?
Not only is property management affordable, using a property manager can actually increase your property's overall profitability. Most property managers charge a small percentage of your monthly rent in exchange for comprehensive services that range from finding and screening tenants, to handling emergency maintenance, to keeping the books and preparing year-end taxes. 
For what usually amounts to $100.00-$200.00 per month, you can outsource all of the responsibilities related to managing your rental property. When you weigh that fee against the 10-15 hours per month you'd likely spend managing the property yourself, not to mention being constantly on-call in case of emergency, the tradeoff becomes pretty clear.
You should also consider that property management companies are experts at preventing vacancies and turnover costs, the two factors that can sink your profit margins almost instantly. As the owner of a single-family rental home, keeping your property filled is especially important---your total revenue is likely generated by a single set of tenants. 



View More



 

How can I find the right property management company for me?
You can take the first step toward finding the right property management company by using All Property Management's search feature to locate the property managers in your area who manage single family homes. We recommend that you speak with two or three companies to determine which company's services, strengths, and fee structure best suit your needs. 




Popular City Searches


Atlanta, GA
Austin, TX
Boston, MA
Charlotte, NC
Chicago, IL
Dallas, TX
Denver, CO
Fort Lauderdale, FL
Houston, TX
Indianapolis, IN
Las Vegas, NV
Los Angeles, CA


Miami, FL
Minneapolis, MN
New York, NY
Orlando, FL
Philadelphia, PA
Phoenix, AZ
San Antonio, TX
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Seattle, WA
Washington, DC


More











Key Questions Answered
How to Select a Property Manager
DIY vs. Professional Property Management
How much does property management cost?
Top Interview Questions to ask a Property Manager
Does professional property management pay for itself?




Popular Articles
Is Your Rental Property a Meth Lab?
How to Screen a Tenant
Property Management & Gentrification
How to Deal with Tenant Evictions
Property Management Agreements: a Primer






Tools and Calculators
Rent Versus Sell Calculator
Property Investment Calculator
Quiz: Should you manage your own property?




Useful Resources
Property Law Directory by State
Rental Ranking
Rental Health Index
Fair Housing Issues Explained
Free eBook: 7 Deadly Sins of Property Management
Apps and Software Reviews
Sign up for Newsletter












Copyright © 2004-2017
All Property Management™
      All Rights Reserved




Property Owners

Single Family
Multi-Family
HOA
Commercial
Property Management 101
Resources
Ask A Pro
Blog
APM Bulletin



Property Managers

Join Our Network
Resource Center
Client Center



General Information

About Us
Jobs
Contact Us
Terms of Service



Contact Us
Talk to an expert
 855-378-0956      
Follow Us

















 

Homeowner Association (HOA) Management Companies | APM

















 









Talk to an expert, call 855-378-0956



Single Family
Multi-Family
HOA
Commercial
Property Management  

Property Management  
Resources 
Ask A Pro 
Blog 





toggle menu

Menu









Find Your Community HOA Advocate




Select Property Type:
Required
Property's Zip:
Required



Select property typeHomeowners Association (2-49 units)Homeowners Association (50-99 units)Homeowners Association (100+ units)Condominium Association (2-49 units)Condominium Association (50-99 units)Condominium Association (100+ units)Other Associations (Hotel, Resort etc.)Mobile Home Community 

Search


Search our nationwide directory of the top HOA managers to be yourdues wrangler, legal advisor, maintenance mogul and more.




How We Help Find Your Perfect HOA Property Manager



Select your property's type and zip code




Review listings of top local property managers that fit your criteria




Select up to 5 and compare quotes




Discuss your unique needs with the property managers












Common Questions About HOA Property Management



Should my HOA hire a property manager?
Hiring a Professional Property Manager for your HOA or Condo Association is the surest way to build value for you and your fellow homeowners. They bring the latest professional standards and proven cost-effective methods to make your Association more responsive and effective in meeting your community's needs. 
A professional HOA management company can deliver the following key results:

Faster response times
Safe and efficient financial management, including dues collection, reporting and funds control
Better governance and legal compliance
Fairness and equity in handling disputes
Better vendor relations and discounts on required services

Approximately 75% of Homeowner associations are managed by professional management companies. Finding the firm to best fits your needs is what we're all about. 



View More



 

What should I look for in a professional HOA manager?
The most effective attributes a successful HOA Property Management Company can have are: 1.) the ability to handle day-to-day issues without supervision 2.) guide the Board's decision-making processes and 3.) be responsive to homeowners. 
Naturally, a successful HOA manager should be professionally compentent in all aspects of Association Management and have the requisite certifications and track record to perform their required duties. But there are other attributes that are important to be a successful HOA service provider.
Homeowners have more permanence than renters, so effective HOA Management must consider the long-term implications of its actions differently than a typical property management firm. Consistency, longevity and proven experience are important considerations, as are the interpersonal skills of the firm's managers in dealing with conflicts, emergencies and the expressed interests of the Board in improving their community.
With this in mind, it's important to hire an HOA management company that has proven methods for managing group politics and negotiating agreements among members with conflicting points of view. As you interview potential HOA managers, be sure to focus a significant portion of your discussions on understanding each manager's typical communication methods and tactics for conflict resolution. 



View More



 

How can I find an HOA management company?
Most HOA boards interview several managers before making a final decision about which company to hire.All Property Management has an extensive network of qualified HOA Management Companies to choose from along with helping learning resources to help you get the best results for your specific needs. Please keep in mind that selecting a firm is a long term decision and changeover costs can be high, so make sure you review candidates thoroughly before making a final decision. 




Top Cities for HOA Management


Atlanta, GA
Aurora, CO
Austin, TX
Boston, MA 
Brooklyn, NY
Charlotte, NC
Chicago, IL
Cincinnati, OH
Dallas, TX
Denver, CO
Houston, TX
Indianapolis, IN
Jacksonville, FL


Las Vegas, NV
Los Angeles, CA
Maryland Metros
Miami, FL
Minneapolis, MN
New Jersey Metros
Phoenix, AZ
San Antonio, TX
San Diego, CA
San Jose, CA
Scottsdale, AZ
Seattle, WA
Washington, DC


More
Latest Articles:


Top 5 HOA Complaints
Hiring an HOA Firm
HOA fees and services













Key Questions Answered
How to Select a Property Manager
DIY vs. Professional Property Management
How much does property management cost?
Top Interview Questions to ask a Property Manager
Does professional property management pay for itself?




Popular Articles
Is Your Rental Property a Meth Lab?
How to Screen a Tenant
Property Management & Gentrification
How to Deal with Tenant Evictions
Property Management Agreements: a Primer






Tools and Calculators
Rent Versus Sell Calculator
Property Investment Calculator
Quiz: Should you manage your own property?




Useful Resources
Property Law Directory by State
Rental Ranking
Rental Health Index
Fair Housing Issues Explained
Free eBook: 7 Deadly Sins of Property Management
Apps and Software Reviews
Sign up for Newsletter












Copyright © 2004-2017
All Property Management™
      All Rights Reserved




Property Owners

Single Family
Multi-Family
HOA
Commercial
Property Management 101
Resources
Ask A Pro
Blog
APM Bulletin



Property Managers

Join Our Network
Resource Center
Client Center



General Information

About Us
Jobs
Contact Us
Terms of Service



Contact Us
Talk to an expert
 855-378-0956      
Follow Us

















 

Apartment Property Management Companies | APM

















 









Talk to an expert, call 855-378-0956



Single Family
Multi-Family
HOA
Commercial
Property Management  

Property Management  
Resources 
Ask A Pro 
Blog 





toggle menu

Menu









Find Local Multi-Family Property Managers




Select Property Type:
Required
Property's Zip:
Required



Select property typeMulti-Family (2-4 units)Multi-Family (5-19 units)Multi-Family (20-99 units)Multi-Family (100+ units) 

Search


Search the largest directory of duplex or apartment building managers.Let them deal with tenants & legal issues for your real estate investment.




How We Help Find Your Perfect Property Manager



Select your property's type and zip code




Review listings of top local property managers that fit your criteria




Select up to 5 and compare quotes




Discuss your unique needs with the property managers












What Does an Apartment Manager Do?



An apartment or duplex building manager handles the day-to-day operations of an apartment complex, whether big or small. While the responsibilities will vary based on the specific needs of the complex’s owners and the agreed upon employment terms with the management company, their duties can include any or all of the following:

Rental Payment: A manager plays two roles, 1) rent enforcer and 2) payment. They will manage collecting rent and use their local knowledge to set the right rental payment levels to attract tenants and get you the most from your investment.
Manage Tenants: From finding tenants to dealing with complaints and evictions, an apartment complex manager handles it all. In addition they screen tenants, negotiate leases, facilitate move-in and move-out inspections and more.
Maintenance & Repair: a building manager handles the physical management of the property, including regular and preventative maintenance, as well as repairs.
Legal Issues: Professional managers know local, state and national laws for screening tenants, handling security deposits, terminating a lease, evicting a tenant, and complying with safety standards.
Budget & Records: The manager must maintain thorough records, including income and expenses, inspections, leases, maintenance requests, complaints, repairs, rent collection, insurance and can help with taxes for the property.


Any tips on hiring the RIGHT property manager?
Here is a great checklist for finding a capable apartment or duplex complex manager:

Proven Profit: A track record of profitably managing complexes
Reviews: A strong background in customer service and former tenant reviews
Assistance: A crew of maintenance professionals or relationships with local vendors
Planning: Detailed, computerized accounting and seasonal maintenance tracking systems
Licensed: Professional certifications or licenses from trade organizations such as: the Institute of Real Estate Management, National Apartment Association, National Association of Residential Property Managers and the Community Associations Institute.



Do I really need an apartment building management company?
The more tenants you have the higher volume of complaints, maintenance issues, and vacancies you will need to deal with. It is in your best interest to employ a manager to quickly respond to emergencies and collect the rent on time.
Apartment building managers have professional knowledge to assist you with hiring and managing local vendors, keeping current with local, state and federal housing laws, maintaining low vacancy rates, and dealing with sensitive tenant issues such as evictions. 

How can I easily find a property manager?
At All Property Management, we make it easy to find the right apartment complex manager for your rental property, whether you’re looking for someone to manage a few apartments and townhomes, a large apartment complex, commercial property – or a portfolio that includes all these and more. Just select the property type and fill in your rental’s zip code to generate an instant list of apartment building managers in your area. For best results, we recommend interviewing at least two or three companies to find the one that is best suited for your needs. 



Top Multi-Family Cities


Atlanta, GA
Austin, TX
Boston, MA
Charlotte, NC
Chicago, IL
Dallas, TX
Denver, CO
Fort Lauderdale, FL
Houston, TX
Indianapolis, IN
Las Vegas, NV
Los Angeles, CA


Miami, FL
Minneapolis, MN
New York, NY
Orlando, FL
Philadelphia, PA
Phoenix, AZ
San Antonio, TX
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Seattle, WA
Washington, DC


More











Key Questions Answered
How to Select a Property Manager
DIY vs. Professional Property Management
How much does property management cost?
Top Interview Questions to ask a Property Manager
Does professional property management pay for itself?




Popular Articles
Is Your Rental Property a Meth Lab?
How to Screen a Tenant
Property Management & Gentrification
How to Deal with Tenant Evictions
Property Management Agreements: a Primer






Tools and Calculators
Rent Versus Sell Calculator
Property Investment Calculator
Quiz: Should you manage your own property?




Useful Resources
Property Law Directory by State
Rental Ranking
Rental Health Index
Fair Housing Issues Explained
Free eBook: 7 Deadly Sins of Property Management
Apps and Software Reviews
Sign up for Newsletter












Copyright © 2004-2017
All Property Management™
      All Rights Reserved




Property Owners

Single Family
Multi-Family
HOA
Commercial
Property Management 101
Resources
Ask A Pro
Blog
APM Bulletin



Property Managers

Join Our Network
Resource Center
Client Center



General Information

About Us
Jobs
Contact Us
Terms of Service



Contact Us
Talk to an expert
 855-378-0956      
Follow Us



























National Pen® Official Site | Promotional Products Since 1966






























 
















  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  
























Quick Shopping Links

Toggle Links



 Quick Shopping Links   National Pen Brand  Buy 1, Get Some Free  Sales & Closeout New Products  Best Selling Products  Rush Service  Full Color Designs 









Submit









Personalized Pens  Retractable Pens Plastic Pens Metal Pens Gel Ink Pens Blue Ink Pens BIC & National Pen  Bags  Tote Bags Coolers  Drinkware  Travel Mugs Water Bottles  Office  Magnets Letter Openers  Auto & Home  Key Chains Flashlights  Stationery  Note Pads Sticky Notes Calendars  Popular Brands  BIC PaperMate Uni-Ball Sharpie KOOZIE 







xClose

	Free Shipping & Setup for New Customers with coupon code FREE!
































 Popular Searches    Contour Pens Squiggle Pens Colorama Pens Cirrus Pens     DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Superball Pen Flashlight Pens     Custom Selfie Stick Key Chain Flashlight  Stylus Pens BIC Pens     Tech Gadgets Budget Friendly Products Low Minimum Pens All Promotional Products    




National Pen®  - Your #1 source for promotional products and personalized pens
National Pen®  offers high quality personalized products at factory-direct pricing.  In business over 45 years, we manufacture and assemble many of our promotional products in the USA.  Advertise your business by imprinting your company name or logo on personalized pens, key chains, note pads, magnets, calendars, mugs, tote bags & more.  Personalized promotional products are perfect for trade show giveaways, customer appreciation, corporate events, and marketing your brand.




























+Close
Join Our Email List


Join our list to be the first to know about new products, special offers, sales and more!
Plus, get 15% off  your next order.


Email:


First Name:


Last Name:


Cancel


                            You can opt out at anytime. Please refer to our Privacy Policy
 or Contact Us
 for more details












XClose
Survey
























Closeout Promotional Products: Pens, Pencils & More | Pens.com





































 
















  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  





























Closeout




































Narrow Your Search:

Toggle filter



Category



						Writing Closeout (2)
					  





						Auto and Home Closeout (12)
					  





						Office Closeout (11)
					  





						Tech Closeout (5)
					  





						Drinkware Closeout (1)
					  


Product Colors



						Assorted (8)
					  





						Black (13)
					  





						Blue (13)
					  





						Brown (1)
					  





						Burgundy (1)
					  





						Custom (2)
					  





						Gold (1)
					  





						Gray (1)
					  





						Green (7)
					  





						Multi-Color (1)
					  





						Show More...


Price



						$0.39 or Less (2)
					  





						$0.40 - $0.59 (4)
					  





						$0.60 - $0.79 (1)
					  





						$0.80 - $0.99 (3)
					  





						$1.00 - $1.49 (10)
					  





						$1.50 - $1.99 (4)
					  





						$2.00 - $2.99 (2)
					  





						$3.00 - $4.99 (5)
					  


Minimum Quantity



						10 - 49 (5)
					  





						50 - 99 (23)
					  





						100 - 199 (2)
					  





						200 or More (1)
					  





Recently Viewed Products:

Toggle Recently Viewed





You have no recently viewed items










xClose

	Free Shipping & Setup for New Customers with coupon code FREE!






Closeout Promotional Items


        31 results found











Items per page:


                                      12
24
36
48
All

Sort by:

Default
Best Sellers
Price: Low - High
Price: High - Low
Minimum Quantity
Name: A - Z
Name: Z - A


  Grid
  List




















				Handy Helper Phone Stand





						As low as

		$1.16

						each!


















				Laser Engraved Journal with Strap





						As low as

		$3.19

						each!


















				Executive Notepad with Neon Flags





						As low as

		$1.59

						each!


















				Deluxe Sticky Notebook with Apple Notes





						As low as

		$1.45

						each!


















				Window Frame Journal





						As low as

		$1.89

						each!


















				School Pouch





						As low as

		$0.89

						each!


















				Contempo Desk Calculator





						As low as

		$2.29

						each!


















				USB Laptop LED Flex-Light





						As low as

		$1.29

						each!


















				Glitter/Sparkle Pencil





						As low as

		$0.19

						each!


















				Trusty Dual Light with Bottle Opener





						As low as

		$1.49

						each!


















				Patriot Party Light





						As low as

		$0.79

						each!


















				Expedition Key Ring





						As low as

		$1.39

						each!














1
2
3



This closeout sale is a great way to save on some of the hottest promotional items around. From customized key rings that sport your company's logo to colorful pens that your clients can't help but notice, this page contains dependable, high-quality products at a fraction of their regular cost.With your personalized closeout order, you'll receive steeply discounted products without compromising on quality. These savings are sure to magnify your already deep closeout discounts of 50 percent or more. These items aren't just affordable: Designed with the highest quality in mind, they're designed to offer the best value around. Each closeout spiral notebook is held together with the finest plastic rings that can be customized in virtually any color of your choosing.Every sturdy carabiner is tested to ensure that it can hold a solid load. Even the closeout zoom-light key chains that you'll find here are built to emit concentrated, powerful illumination that can help your clients read in the dark or find their way around a closet.Of course, no closeout sale would be complete without a full range of customization options. With over 500 custom colors and the ability to imprint a wide range of images and characters onto each item of your order, your closeout order is sure to help your company stand out from the crowd.These personalized products are great for distributing at big events like trade shows or conventions, and they work well as guerrilla marketing tools as well. You can even use them to turn your next customer appreciation day into an advertising bonanza.Before you place your order, be sure to make it your own. For maximum impact, wrap your items with a printed image or logo that sums up your business. To stay fresh in the minds of prospective clients, imprint your company's slogan or contact information on your closeout products. Once you're ready to purchase, simply choose your desired quantity and await your game-changing shipment.





































Back to School | National Pen




 












  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  



















	    	    
		 
		





Back to School









Fun Supplies 


Everyday Necessities 


Upgraded Basics 




Shop by Category


Pens & Writing


Stationery


Bags


Drinkware


Tech Gadgets


Apparel & Accessories






Top Picks




 






					Deluxe Neon Round Pencil



								As low as 
		$0.16

								each!







 






					The Campus Backpack



								As low as 
		$7.86

								each!







 






					The Star Spiral Notebook



								As low as 
		$1.63

								each!







 






					Clear Solar Calculator



								As low as 
		$2.76

								each!







 






					BIC® 3x3 Die Cut Sticky Notepad-50 Sheet-Octagon



								As low as 
		$0.95

								each!







 






					8" Calculator / Ruler



								As low as 
		$1.49

								each!







 






					Budget Lunch Bag



								As low as 
		$1.49

								each!







 






					6 Piece Crayon Set



								As low as 
		$0.44

								each!
































New Promotional Products to Boost Business | National Pen






















































  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  





























New Products




































Narrow Your Search:

Toggle filter



Category



						Bags (35)
					  





						Drinkware (1)
					  


Product Colors



						Black (15)
					  





						Blue (15)
					  





						Brown (3)
					  





						Gray (1)
					  





						Green (10)
					  





						Orange (5)
					  





						Purple (7)
					  





						Red (6)
					  





						Silver (10)
					  





						Translucent (11)
					  





						White (21)
					  





						Yellow (4)
					  


Price



						$1.00 - $1.49 (17)
					  





						$1.50 - $1.99 (18)
					  





						$3.00 - $4.99 (1)
					  


Shipping



						Ships in 4-10 Business Days (35)
					  





						Ships in 11-15 Business Days (1)
					  


Minimum Quantity



						50 - 99 (1)
					  





						100 - 199 (35)
					  


Brand



						National Pen (1)
					  





Recently Viewed Products:

Toggle Recently Viewed





You have no recently viewed items










xClose

	Free Shipping & Setup for New Customers with coupon code FREE!






New Products


        36 results found











Items per page:


                                      12
24
36
48
All

Sort by:

Default
Best Sellers
Price: Low - High
Price: High - Low
Minimum Quantity
Name: A - Z
Name: Z - A


  Grid
  List




















				Vp Frosted Plastic Bag-Clear Tube Handles 10" x 8"





						As low as

		$1.90

						each!


















				Paris Paper Bag





						As low as

		$1.48

						each!


















				Mars Frosted Plastic Bag-Loop Handles 8" x 10"





						As low as

		$1.45

						each!


















				Pisces Frosted Plastic Bag-Macramé Handles 10"x8"





						As low as

		$1.60

						each!


















				Jewel Paper Bag





						As low as

		$1.40

						each!


















				London Paper Bag





						As low as

		$1.65

						each!


















				McKinley Paper Bag





						As low as

		$1.92

						each!


















				Jumbo Large Bottom T-Shirt Style Bag - Hot Stamp





						As low as

		$1.45

						each!


















				Scorpio Frosted Plstc Bag-Macramé Handles 13"x10"





						As low as

		$1.70

						each!


















				Chablis Paper Bag





						As low as

		$1.56

						each!


















				Jupiter Plastic Bag





						As low as

		$1.58

						each!


















				Rome Paper Bag





						As low as

		$1.73

						each!














1
2
3



Your personalized new promotional products will do more than offer people an item that they can use constantly; they will promote your business and remind people that you are just a phone call away.

At National Pen, we have several new promotional products that will impress anyone who receives them. As with all our pens, you can personalize the new promotional products to bear your company's name, the street address, the telephone number and your website address. These pens can even be printed with your logo in full color. Our online tools with a wide selection of colors and fonts makes it easy to customize a new promotional product that will market your brand and help people remember you.

All our custom new promotional products are low priced to easily fit into your advertising budget. They are highly cost-effective, but they are also of extremely high quality. National Pen products are built to last so that they can keep your company's name in your customers' minds. You will always be proud to hand out our personalized pens to promote your company.

Sending your regular customers promotional pens is a great way to remind them that you appreciate their business. Customized products are also good for attracting new clients. If you're going to participate in a trade show, giving away pens would encourage the passers-by to remember your booth and select your services. Any time that you need to market your business at a corporate event, customized pens will be a gift that the recipient can remember. Whether as a giveaway prize or part of a marketing set, new promotional products by National Pen can help set your company apart from the competition. 

We always offer high quality and low prices on customized new promotional products. For your advertising needs, choose National Pen. 






























BNY Mellon | The Investments Company for the World





















































 



















We use cookies to improve your experience on our websites. By continuing you are giving consent to cookies being used.Learn More





Discover Why Collateral is the New Performance Driver
The Buy-Side's Hunt for Funding and Liquidity Read the Report






Perspectives
Funds, Fintech and Hong Kong’s Future






Who We Are
Our 2016 CSR Report









Our Thinking







ASSET ALLOCATION AND INVESTMENT STRATEGY
The Power of Prediction








ASSET ALLOCATION AND INVESTMENT STRATEGY
Swimming Against the Tide








GLOBAL MARKET OPPORTUNITIES
Depositary Receipt Market Review







News





2nd Quarter 2017 Financial ResultsBNY Mellon announces the results of its second quarter earnings. Access the conference call webcast and earnings press release.View the Results


Charles W. Scharf Appointed CEO of BNY Mellon; To Become Chairman on January 1, 2018Charles W. Scharf has been appointed Chief Executive Officer and a Director of the company, effective immediately, and will become Chairman of the Board of Directors effective January 1, 2018.  Gerald L. Hassell will continue to serve as Chairman of the Board through December 31, 2017, working closely with Mr. Scharf to ensure a seamless transition of responsibilities. Learn More


BNY Mellon's Pershing Launches No-Transaction-Fee ETF Platform: FundVest® ETFBNY Mellon's Pershing launched its new no-transaction-fee (NTF) exchange-traded fund (ETF) platform: FundVest® ETF. The NTF platform requires no purchase minimums or holding period, and will be available to all Pershing clients.READ PRESS RELEASE











 







 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





Mellon Capital Management - Financial District - 18 visitors


FoursquareLog InSign UpNearby:Get inspired:Top PicksTrendingFoodCoffeeNightlifeFunShoppingMellon Capital ManagementOfficeFinancial District, San FranciscoSaveShareTipsMellon Capital ManagementNo tips and reviewsLog in to leave a tip here.PostNo tips yetWrite a short note about what you liked, what to order, or other helpful advice for visitors.0 PhotoRelated Searchesmellon capital management san francisco  mellon capital management san francisco photos  mellon capital management san francisco location  mellon capital management san francisco address  mellon capital management san francisco  mellon capital management san francisco  mellon capital management financial district san franciscoAboutBlogBusinessesCitiesDevelopersHelpJobsCookies (Updated)Privacy (Updated)TermsEnglishEnglish Français Deutsch Bahasa Indonesia Italiano 日本語 한국어 Português Русский Español ภาษาไทย Türkçe Cities:AtlantaAustinBostonChicagoDallasDenverHoustonLas VegasLos AngelesNew YorkPhiladelphiaPortlandSan DiegoSan FranciscoSeattleWashington, D.C.Countries:BelgiumBrazilCanadaChileFinlandFranceGermanyGreat BritainHungaryIndonesiaJapanMexicoNetherlandsPhilippinesRussiaSingaporeSpainThailandTurkeyMore Great Places in San Francisco:abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz#Foursquare © 2017  Lovingly made in NYC & SFMellon Capital Management50 Fremont St (Mission)San Francisco, CA 94105United StatesGet directions None listed (See when people check in)People tend to check in during these times:Today6:00 AM–8:00 PMWed6:00 AM–5:00 PMThu7:00 AM–5:00 PM7:00 PM–8:00 PMFri7:00 AM–5:00 PMSat–SunNoneMon6:00 AM–3:00 PM6:00 PM–7:00 PMSee MoreUnited States » San Francisco County » San Francisco » Financial DistrictProfessional & Other Places » OfficeIs this your business? Claim it now.Make sure your information is up to date. Plus use our free tools to find new customers.You must enable JavaScript to use foursquare.comWe use the latest and greatest technology available to provide the best possible web experience.Please enable JavaScript in your browser settings to continue.Download Foursquare for your smart phone and start exploring the world around you!












Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


